Washington statutes.
RCW 18.350.040

Authorized functions—Supervision.

(1) Any dental anesthesia assistant certified pursuant to this chapter shall perform the functions authorized in this chapter only by delegation of authority from the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist and under the supervision, as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, of the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist acting within the scope of his or her license. The responsibility for monitoring a patient and determining the selection of the drug, dosage, and timing of all anesthetic medications rests solely with the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist.

(2) Under close supervision, the dental anesthesia assistant may:

(a) Initiate and discontinue an intravenous line for a patient being prepared to receive intravenous medications, sedation, or general anesthesia; and

(b) Adjust the rate of intravenous fluids infusion only to maintain or keep the line patent or open.

(3) Under direct visual supervision, the dental anesthesia assistant may:

(a) Draw up and prepare medications;

(b) Follow instructions to deliver medications into an intravenous line upon verbal command;

(c) Adjust the rate of intravenous fluids infusion beyond a keep open rate;

(d) Adjust an electronic device to provide medications, such as an infusion pump;

(e) Administer emergency medications to a patient in order to assist the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist in an emergency.

(4) Any oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist delegating duties under this section must have a valid general anesthesia permit and, if the dental anesthesia assistant does not possess advanced cardiac life support training, must be current in such training.

[ 2012 c 23 s 4.]